Washington statutes.
RCW 41.08.070

Qualifications of applicants.

An applicant for a position of any kind under civil service under the provisions of this chapter, must be a citizen of the United States of America, a lawful permanent resident, or a deferred action for childhood arrivals recipient. An applicant for a position of any kind under civil service under the provisions of this chapter must be able to speak, read, and write the English language.

An applicant for a position of any kind under civil service must be of an age suitable for the position applied for, in ordinary good health, of good moral character and of temperate and industrious habits; these facts to be ascertained in such manner as the commission may deem advisable.

[ 2024 c 330 s 5; 2018 c 32 s 1; 1972 ex.s. c 37 s 2; 1963 c 95 s 1; 1935 c 31 s 7; RRS s 9558-7.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1972 ex.s. c 37: "It is the purpose of this 1972 amendatory act to increase the availability of qualified applicants for employment in positions of public safety in municipal government; namely, firemen and policemen; and to eliminate present inequities that result from the application of residency requirements under existing statutes pertaining to such employment." [ 1972 ex.s. c 37 s 1.]